California statutes. Penal Code
If after the commencement of the trial of a criminal action or proceeding in any court the judge or justice presiding at the trial shall die, become ill, or for any other reason be unable to proceed with the trial, any other judge or justice of the court in which the trial is proceeding may proceed with and finish the trial; or if there be no other judge or justice of that court available, then the clerk, sheriff, or marshal shall adjourn the court and notify the Chairman of the Judicial Council of the facts, and shall continue the case from day to day until the time that the chairman shall designate and assign a judge or justice of some other court, and the judge or justice shall arrive, to proceed with and complete the trial, or until such time as by stipulation in writing between the prosecuting attorney and the attorney for the defendant, filed with the court, a judge or justice shall be agreed upon by them, and the judge or justice shall arrive to complete the trial. The judge or justice authorized by this section to proceed with and complete the trial shall have the same power, authority, and jurisdiction as if the trial had been commenced before that judge or justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 118.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Discovery [1054. - 1054.10.]

1054.

This chapter shall be interpreted to give effect to all of the following purposes:

(a) To promote the ascertainment of truth in trials by requiring timely pretrial discovery.

(b) To save court time by requiring that discovery be conducted informally between and among the parties before judicial enforcement is requested.

(c) To save court time in trial and avoid the necessity for frequent interruptions and postponements.

(d) To protect victims and witnesses from danger, harassment, and undue delay of the proceedings.

(e) To provide that no discovery shall occur in criminal cases except as provided by this chapter, other express statutory provisions, or as mandated by the Constitution of the United States.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.1.

The prosecuting attorney shall disclose to the defendant or his or her attorney all of the following materials and information, if it is in the possession of the prosecuting attorney or if the prosecuting attorney knows it to be in the possession of the investigating agencies:

(a) The names and addresses of persons the prosecutor intends to call as witnesses at trial.

(b) Statements of all defendants.

(c) All relevant real evidence seized or obtained as a part of the investigation of the offenses charged.

(d) The existence of a felony conviction of any material witness whose credibility is likely to be critical to the outcome of the trial.

(e) Any exculpatory evidence.

(f) Relevant written or recorded statements of witnesses or reports of the statements of witnesses whom the prosecutor intends to call at the trial, including any reports or statements of experts made in conjunction with the case, including the results of physical or mental examinations, scientific tests, experiments, or comparisons which the prosecutor intends to offer in evidence at the trial.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.2.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no attorney shall disclose or permit to be disclosed to a defendant, members of the defendant’s family, or anyone else, the personal identifying information of a victim or witness whose name is disclosed to the attorney pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1054.1, other than the name of the victim or witness, unless specifically permitted to do so by the court after a hearing and a showing of good cause.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an attorney may disclose or permit to be disclosed the personal identifying information of a victim or witness to persons employed by the attorney
 or to persons appointed by the court to assist in the preparation of a defendant’s case if that disclosure is required for that preparation. Persons provided this information by an attorney shall be informed by the attorney that further dissemination of the information, except as provided by this section, is prohibited.

(b) If the defendant is acting as their own attorney, the court shall endeavor to protect the personal identifying information of a victim or witness by providing for contact only through a private investigator licensed by the Department of Consumer Affairs and appointed by the court or by imposing other reasonable restrictions, absent a showing of good cause as determined by the court.

(c) For the purposes of this section, personal identifying information
 has the same definition as in Section 530.55, except that it does not include name, place of employment, or an equivalent form of identification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 91, Sec. 1.   (AB 419)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.3.

(a) The defendant and his or her attorney shall disclose to the prosecuting attorney:

(1) The names and addresses of persons, other than the defendant, he or she intends to call as witnesses at trial, together with any relevant written or recorded statements of those persons, or reports of the statements of those persons, including any reports or statements of experts made in connection with the case, and including the results of physical or mental examinations, scientific tests, experiments, or comparisons which the defendant intends to offer in evidence at the trial.

(2) Any real evidence which the defendant intends to offer in evidence at the trial.

(b) (1) Unless otherwise specifically addressed by an existing provision of law, whenever a defendant in a criminal action or a minor in a juvenile proceeding brought pursuant to a petition alleging the juvenile to be within Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code places in issue his or her mental state at any phase of the criminal action or juvenile proceeding through the proposed testimony of any mental health expert, upon timely request by the prosecution, the court may order that the defendant or juvenile submit to examination by a prosecution-retained mental health expert.

(A) The prosecution shall bear the cost of any such mental health expert’s fees
 for examination and testimony at a criminal trial or juvenile court proceeding.

(B) The prosecuting attorney shall submit a list of tests proposed to be administered by the prosecution expert to the defendant in a criminal action or a minor in a juvenile proceeding. At the request of the defendant in a criminal action or a minor in a juvenile proceeding, a hearing shall be held to consider any objections raised to the proposed tests before any test is administered. Before ordering that the defendant submit to the examination, the trial court must make a threshold determination that the proposed tests bear some reasonable relation to the mental state placed in issue by the defendant in a criminal action or a minor in a juvenile
 proceeding. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term “tests” shall include any and all assessment techniques such as a clinical interview or a mental status examination.

(2) The purpose of this subdivision is to respond to Verdin v. Superior Court 43 Cal.4th 1096, which held that only the Legislature may authorize a court to order the appointment of a prosecution mental health expert when a defendant has placed his or her mental state at issue in a criminal case or juvenile proceeding pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Other than authorizing the court to order testing by prosecution-retained mental health experts in response to Verdin v. Superior Court, supra, it is not the intent of the Legislature to disturb, in
 any way, the remaining body of case law governing the procedural or substantive law that controls the administration of these tests or the admission of the results of these tests into evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 297, Sec. 1.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Note: This section was added on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 115.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.4.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting any law enforcement or prosecuting agency from obtaining nontestimonial evidence to the extent permitted by law on the effective date of this section.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.5.

(a) No order requiring discovery shall be made in criminal cases except as provided in this chapter. This chapter shall be the only means by which the defendant may compel the disclosure or production of information from prosecuting attorneys, law enforcement agencies which investigated or prepared the case against the defendant, or any other persons or agencies which the prosecuting attorney or investigating agency may have employed to assist them in performing their duties.

(b) Before a party may seek court enforcement of any of the disclosures required by this chapter, the party shall make an informal request of opposing counsel for the desired materials and information. If within 15 days the opposing counsel fails to provide the materials and information requested, the party may seek a court order. Upon a showing that a party has not complied with Section 1054.1 or 1054.3 and upon a showing that the moving party complied with the informal discovery procedure provided in this subdivision, a court may make any order necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, immediate disclosure, contempt proceedings, delaying or prohibiting the testimony of a witness or the presentation of real evidence, continuance of the matter, or any other lawful order. Further, the court may advise the jury of any failure or refusal to disclose and of any untimely disclosure.

(c) The court may prohibit the testimony of a witness pursuant to subdivision (b) only if all other sanctions have been exhausted. The court shall not dismiss a charge pursuant to subdivision (b) unless required to do so by the Constitution of the United States.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.6.

Neither the defendant nor the prosecuting attorney is required to disclose any materials or information which are work product as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2018.030 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or which are privileged pursuant to an express statutory provision, or are privileged as provided by the Constitution of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.    Note: This section was added on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 115.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.7.

The disclosures required under this chapter shall be made at least 30 days prior to the trial, unless good cause is shown why a disclosure should be denied, restricted, or deferred. If the material and information becomes known to, or comes into the possession of, a party within 30 days of trial, disclosure shall be made immediately, unless good cause is shown why a disclosure should be denied, restricted, or deferred. “Good cause” is limited to threats or possible danger to the safety of a victim or witness, possible loss or destruction of evidence, or possible compromise of other investigations by law enforcement.

Upon the request of any party, the court may permit a showing of good cause for the denial or regulation of disclosures, or any portion of that showing, to be made in camera. A verbatim record shall be made of any such proceeding. If the court enters an order granting relief following a showing in camera, the entire record of the showing shall be sealed and preserved in the records of the court, and shall be made available to an appellate court in the event of an appeal or writ. In its discretion, the trial court may after trial and conviction, unseal any previously sealed matter.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.8.

(a) No prosecuting attorney, attorney for the defendant, or investigator for either the prosecution or the defendant shall interview, question, or speak to a victim or witness whose name has been disclosed by the opposing party pursuant to Section 1054.1 or 1054.3 without first clearly identifying himself or herself, identifying the full name of the agency by whom he or she is employed, and identifying whether he or she represents, or has been retained by, the prosecution or the defendant. If the interview takes place in person, the party shall also show the victim or witness a business card, official badge, or other form of official identification before commencing the interview or questioning.

(b) Upon a showing that a person has failed to comply with this section, a court may issue any order authorized by Section 1054.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 630, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.9.

(a) In a case in which a defendant is or has ever been convicted of a felony resulting in incarceration in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, upon the prosecution of a postconviction writ of habeas corpus or a motion to vacate a judgment, or in preparation to file that writ or motion, and on a showing that good faith efforts to obtain discovery materials from trial counsel were made and were unsuccessful, the court shall, except as provided in subdivision (b) or (d), or when a
 protective order prohibits disclosure, order that the defendant be provided reasonable access to any of the discovery materials described in subdivision (c).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in a case in which a sentence other than death or life in prison without the possibility of parole is or has ever been imposed, if a court has entered a previous order granting discovery pursuant to this section, a subsequent order granting discovery pursuant to subdivision (a) may be made in the court’s discretion. A request for discovery subject to this subdivision shall include a statement by the person requesting discovery as to whether that person has previously been granted an order for discovery pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section,
 “discovery materials” means materials in the possession of the prosecution and law enforcement authorities that the same defendant would have been entitled at time of trial or materials that tend to negate guilt, mitigate the offense, mitigate the sentence, or otherwise are favorable or exculpatory to the defendant. “Discovery materials” includes all materials that the convicted person would be entitled to if they were being tried today, irrespective of whether the materials were discoverable at the time of the convicted person’s original trial. “Discovery materials” includes the prosecution’s jury selection notes.

(2) For purposes of this section, “the prosecution” includes the prosecuting agency and counsel for the respondent to a habeas corpus petition. 

(3) This
 section does not impose an additional obligation to investigate the existence of new discovery materials. This section does not prohibit a court from ordering the prosecution or law enforcement to investigate the existence of new discovery materials when appropriate.

(4) (A) If the prosecution believes there is good cause to shield jury selection notes from disclosure, they shall make a foundational proffer describing how information in their file would bear on their case strategy.

(B) If the court finds good cause, the court shall conduct an in camera review and order necessary redactions.

(C) The prosecution’s lack of exercised peremptory challenges during jury selection shall constitute good
 cause to withhold disclosure of jury selection notes pursuant to this section.

(d) In response to a writ or motion satisfying the conditions in subdivision (a), the court may order that the defendant be provided access to physical evidence for the purpose of examination, including, but not limited to, any physical evidence relating to the investigation, arrest, and prosecution of the defendant only upon a showing that there is good cause to believe that access to physical evidence is reasonably necessary to the defendant’s effort to obtain relief. The procedures for obtaining access to physical evidence for purposes of postconviction DNA testing are provided in Section 1405, and this section does not provide an alternative means of access to physical evidence for those purposes.

(e) The actual costs of examination or copying pursuant to this section shall be borne or reimbursed by the defendant.

(f) This section does not require the retention of any discovery materials not otherwise required by law or court order.

(g) In criminal matters involving a conviction for a felony resulting in incarceration in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, trial counsel shall retain a copy of a former client’s files for the term of that client’s imprisonment. An electronic copy is sufficient only
 if every item in the file is digitally copied in color and preserved. To the extent this section imposes new requirements on trial counsel, trial counsel shall begin retaining their physical files and digital color copies of evidence for all felony convictions on or after July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.   (AB 1036)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.10.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no attorney may disclose or permit to be disclosed to a defendant, members of the defendant’s family, or anyone else copies of child pornography evidence, unless specifically permitted to do so by the court after a hearing and a showing of good cause.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an attorney may disclose or permit to be disclosed copies of child pornography evidence to persons employed by the attorney or to persons appointed by the court to assist in the preparation of a defendant’s case if that disclosure is required for that preparation. Persons provided this material by an attorney shall be informed by the attorney that further dissemination of the material, except as provided by this section, is prohibited.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 7. OF PROCEEDINGS AFTER THE COMMENCEMENT OF THE TRIAL AND BEFORE JUDGMENT [1065. - 1188.]



  CHAPTER 1. Challenging the Jury [1065. - 1089.]

1065.

If, either upon an exception to the challenge or a denial of the facts, the challenge is allowed, the Court must discharge the jury so far as the trial in question is concerned. If it is disallowed, the Court must direct the jury to be impaneled.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

[1083.]

Section Ten Hundred and Eighty-three. The Court must allow or disallow the challenge, and its decision must be entered in the minutes of the Court.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 614.)
-------------------------------------------

1089.

Whenever, in the opinion of a judge of a superior court about to try a defendant against whom has been filed any indictment or information or complaint, the trial is likely to be a protracted one, the court may cause an entry to that effect to be made in the minutes of the court, and thereupon, immediately after the jury is impaneled and sworn, the court may direct the calling of one or more additional jurors, in its discretion, to be known as “alternate jurors.”

The alternate jurors must be drawn from the same source, and in the same manner, and have the same qualifications as the jurors already sworn, and be subject to the same examination and challenges, provided that the prosecution and the defendant shall each be entitled to as many peremptory challenges to the alternate jurors as there are alternate jurors called. When two or more defendants are tried jointly each defendant shall be entitled to as many peremptory challenges to the alternate jurors as there are alternate jurors called. The prosecution shall be entitled to additional peremptory challenges equal to the number of all the additional separate challenges allowed the defendant or defendants to the alternate jurors.

The alternate jurors shall be seated so as to have equal power and facilities for seeing and hearing the proceedings in the case, and shall take the same oath as the jurors already selected, and must attend at all times upon the trial of the cause in company with the other jurors, and for a failure so to do are liable to be punished for contempt.

They shall obey the orders of and be bound by the admonition of the court, upon each adjournment of the court; but if the regular jurors are ordered to be kept in the custody of the sheriff or marshal during the trial of the cause, the alternate jurors shall also be kept in confinement with the other jurors; and upon final submission of the case to the jury the alternate jurors shall be kept in the custody of the sheriff or marshal and shall not be discharged until the original jurors are discharged, except as hereinafter provided.

If at any time, whether before or after the final submission of the case to the jury, a juror dies or becomes ill, or upon other good cause shown to the court is found to be unable to perform his or her duty, or if a juror requests a discharge and good cause appears therefor, the court may order the juror to be discharged and draw the name of an alternate, who shall then take a place in the jury box, and be subject to the same rules and regulations as though the alternate juror had been selected as one of the original jurors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 230.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Trial [1093. - 1130.]

1093.

The jury having been impaneled and sworn, unless waived, the trial shall proceed in the following order, unless otherwise directed by the court:

(a) If the accusatory pleading be for a felony, the clerk shall read it, and state the plea of the defendant to the jury, and in cases where it charges a previous conviction, and the defendant has confessed the same, the clerk in reading it shall omit therefrom all that relates to such previous conviction. In all other cases this formality may be dispensed with.

(b) The district attorney, or other counsel for the people, may make an opening statement in support of the charge. Whether or not the district attorney, or other counsel for the people, makes an opening statement, the defendant or his or her counsel may then make an opening statement, or may reserve the making of an opening statement until after introduction of the evidence in support of the charge.

(c) The district attorney, or other counsel for the people shall then offer the evidence in support of the charge. The defendant or his or her counsel may then offer his or her evidence in support of the defense.

(d) The parties may then respectively offer rebutting testimony only, unless the court, for good reason, in furtherance of justice, permit them to offer evidence upon their original case.

(e) When the evidence is concluded, unless the case is submitted on either side, or on both sides, without argument, the district attorney, or other counsel for the people, and counsel for the defendant, may argue the case to the court and jury; the district attorney, or other counsel for the people, opening the argument and having the right to close.

(f) The judge may then charge the jury, and shall do so on any points of law pertinent to the issue, if requested by either party; and the judge may state the testimony, and he or she may make such comment on the evidence and the testimony and credibility of any witness as in his or her opinion is necessary for the proper determination of the case and he or she may declare the law. At the beginning of the trial or from time to time during the trial, and without any request from either party, the trial judge may give the jury such instructions on the law applicable to the case as the judge may deem necessary for their guidance on hearing the case. Upon the jury retiring for deliberation, the court shall advise the jury of the availability of a written copy of the jury instructions. The court may, at its discretion, provide the jury with a copy of the written instructions given. However, if the jury requests the court to supply a copy of the written instructions, the court shall supply the jury with a copy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1045, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1093.5.

In any criminal case which is being tried before the court with a jury, all requests for instructions on points of law must be made to the court and all proposed instructions must be delivered to the court before commencement of argument. Before the commencement of the argument, the court, on request of counsel, must: (1) decide whether to give, refuse, or modify the proposed instructions; (2) decide which instructions shall be given in addition to those proposed, if any; and (3) advise counsel of all instructions to be given. However, if, during the argument, issues are raised which have not been covered by instructions given or refused, the court may, on request of counsel, give additional instructions on the subject matter thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1698.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.

When the state of the pleadings requires it, or in any other case, for good reasons, and in the sound discretion of the court, the order prescribed in Section 1093 may be departed from.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 35, Sec. 11.   (SB 174)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1095.

If the offense charged is punishable with death, two counsel on each side may argue the cause. In any other case the court may, in its discretion, restrict the argument to one counsel on each side.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1096.

A defendant in a criminal action is presumed to be innocent until the contrary is proved, and in case of a reasonable doubt whether his or her guilt is satisfactorily shown, he or she is entitled to an acquittal, but the effect of this presumption is only to place upon the state the burden of proving him or her guilty beyond a reasonable doubt. Reasonable doubt is defined as follows: “It is not a mere possible doubt; because everything relating to human affairs is open to some possible or imaginary doubt. It is that state of the case, which, after the entire comparison and consideration of all the evidence, leaves the minds of jurors in that condition that they cannot say they feel an abiding conviction of the truth of the charge.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Effective July 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1096a.

In charging a jury, the court may read to the jury Section 1096, and no further instruction on the subject of the presumption of innocence or defining reasonable doubt need be given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective July 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1097.

When it appears that the defendant has committed a public offense, or attempted to commit a public offense, and there is reasonable ground of doubt in which of two or more degrees of the crime or attempted crime he is guilty, he can be convicted of the lowest of such degrees only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1166.)
-------------------------------------------

1098.

When two or more defendants are jointly charged with any public offense, whether felony or misdemeanor, they must be tried jointly, unless the court order separate trials. In ordering separate trials, the court in its discretion may order a separate trial as to one or more defendants, and a joint trial as to the others, or may order any number of the defendants to be tried at one trial, and any number of the others at different trials, or may order a separate trial for each defendant; provided, that where two or more persons can be jointly tried, the fact that separate accusatory pleadings were filed shall not prevent their joint trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1099.

When two or more defendants are included in the same accusatory pleading, the court may, at any time before the defendants have gone into their defense, on the application of the prosecuting attorney, direct any defendant to be discharged, that he may be a witness for the people.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1100.

When two or more defendants are included in the same accusatory pleading, and the court is of opinion that in regard to a particular defendant there is not sufficient evidence to put him on his defense, it must order him to be discharged before the evidence is closed, that he may be a witness for his codefendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.

The order mentioned in Sections 1099 and 1100 is an acquittal of the defendant discharged, and is a bar to another prosecution for the same offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.

The rules of evidence in civil actions are applicable also to criminal actions, except as otherwise provided in this Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.6.

The right of a victim of crime to be present during any criminal proceeding shall be secured as follows:

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as specified in subdivision (d), a victim shall be entitled to be present and seated at all criminal proceedings where the defendant, the prosecuting attorney, and the general public are entitled to be present.

(b) A victim may be excluded from a criminal proceeding only if each of the following criteria are met:

(1) Any movant, including the defendant, who seeks to exclude the victim from any criminal proceeding demonstrates that there is a substantial probability that overriding interests will be prejudiced by the presence of the victim. “Overriding interests” may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) The defendant’s right to a fair trial.

(B) The government’s interest in inhibiting the disclosure of sensitive information.

(C) The protection of witnesses from harassment and physical harm.

(D) The court’s interest in maintaining order.

(E) The protection of sexual offense victims from the trauma and embarrassment of testifying.

(F) Safeguarding the physical and psychological well-being of a minor.

(G) The preservation of trade secrets.

(2) The court considers reasonable alternatives to exclusion of the victim from the criminal proceeding.

(3) The exclusion of the victim from any criminal proceeding, or any limitation on his or her presence at any criminal proceeding, is narrowly tailored to serve the overriding interests identified by the movant.

(4) Following a hearing at which any victim who is to be excluded from a criminal proceeding is afforded an opportunity to be heard, the court makes specific factual findings that support the exclusion of the victim from, or any limitation on his or her presence at, the criminal proceeding.

(c) As used in this section, “victim” means (1) the alleged victim of the offense and one person of his or her choosing or however many more the court may allow under the particular circumstances surrounding the proceeding, (2) in the event that the victim is unable to attend the proceeding, two persons designated by the victim or however many more the court may allow under the particular circumstances surrounding the proceeding, or (3) if the victim is no longer living, two members of the victim’s immediate family or however many more the court may allow under the particular circumstances surrounding the proceeding.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent a court from excluding a victim from a criminal proceeding, pursuant to Section 777 of the Evidence Code, when the victim is subpoenaed as a witness. An order of exclusion shall be consistent with the objectives of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) to allow the victim to be present, whenever possible, at all proceedings.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 332, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1109.

(a) If requested by the defense, a case in which a gang enhancement is charged under subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 186.22 shall be tried in separate phases as follows:

(1) The question of the defendant’s guilt of the underlying offense shall be first determined.

(2) If the defendant is found guilty of the underlying offense and there is an allegation of an enhancement under subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 186.22, there shall be further proceedings to the trier of fact on the question of the truth of the enhancement. Allegations that the underlying offense was committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with, a criminal street gang and that the
 underlying offense was committed with the specific intent to promote, further, or assist in criminal conduct by gang members shall be proved by direct or circumstantial evidence.

(b) If a defendant is charged with a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 186.22, this count shall be tried separately from all other counts that do not otherwise require gang evidence as an element of the crime. This charge may be tried in the same proceeding with an allegation of an enhancement under subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 186.22.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 699, Sec. 5.   (AB 333)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.

A conviction can not be had upon the testimony of an accomplice unless it be corroborated by such other evidence as shall tend to connect the defendant with the commission of the offense; and the corroboration is not sufficient if it merely shows the commission of the offense or the circumstances thereof.

An accomplice is hereby defined as one who is liable to prosecution for the identical offense charged against the defendant on trial in the cause in which the testimony of the accomplice is given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1915, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.5.

(a) A jury or judge may not convict a defendant, find a special circumstance true, or use a fact in aggravation based on the uncorroborated testimony of an in-custody informant. The testimony of an in-custody informant shall be corroborated by other evidence that connects the defendant with the commission of the offense, the special circumstance, or the evidence offered in aggravation to which the in-custody informant testifies. Corroboration is not sufficient if it merely shows the commission of the offense or the special circumstance or the circumstance in aggravation. Corroboration of an in-custody informant shall not be provided by the testimony of another in-custody informant unless the party calling the in-custody informant as a witness establishes by a
 preponderance of the evidence that the in-custody informant has not communicated with another in-custody informant on the subject of the testimony.

(b) As used in this section, “in-custody informant” means a person, other than a codefendant, percipient witness, accomplice, or coconspirator, whose testimony is based on statements allegedly made by the defendant while both the defendant and the informant were held within a city or county jail, state penal institution, or correctional institution. Nothing in this section limits or changes the requirements for corroboration of accomplice testimony pursuant to Section 1111.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 153, Sec. 1.   (SB 687)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution, the trial court shall not order any prosecuting witness, complaining witness, or any other witness, or victim in any sexual assault prosecution to submit to a psychiatric or psychological examination for the purpose of assessing his or her credibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1101, Sec. 1.   Effective September 13, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1113.

The Court may direct the jury to be discharged where it appears that it has not jurisdiction of the offense, or that the facts charged do not constitute an offense punishable by law.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

1114.

If the jury be discharged because the Court has not jurisdiction of the offense charged, and it appear that it was committed out of the jurisdiction of this State, the defendant must be discharged.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

1115.

If the offense was committed within the exclusive jurisdiction of another county of this State, the Court must direct the defendant to be committed for such time as it deems reasonable, to await a warrant from the proper county for his arrest; or if the offense is a misdemeanor only, it may admit him to bail in an undertaking, with sufficient sureties, that he will, within such time as the Court may appoint, render himself amenable to a warrant for his arrest from the proper county; and, if not sooner arrested thereon, will attend at the office of the Sheriff of the county where the trial was had, at a certain time particularly specified in the undertaking, to surrender himself upon the warrant, if issued, or that his bail will forfeit such sum as the Court may fix, to be mentioned in the undertaking; and the Clerk must forthwith transmit a certified copy of the indictment or information, and of all the papers filed in the action, to the District Attorney of the proper county, the expense of which transmission is chargeable to that county.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

1116.

If the defendant is not arrested on a warrant from the proper county, as provided in section 1115, he must be discharged from custody, or his bail in the action is exonerated, or money deposited instead of bail must be refunded to him or to the person or persons found by the court to have deposited said money on behalf of said defendant, as the case may be, and the sureties in the undertaking, as mentioned in that section, must be discharged. If he is arrested, the same proceedings must be had thereon as upon the arrest of a defendant in another county on a warrant of arrest issued by a magistrate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------

1117.
